Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Chapter 28 Rehabilitation and Liquidation

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What constitutes insolvency of insurance company justifying state dissolution proceedings and the like, 17 ALR4th 16.

Validity, construction, and application of Uniform Insurers Liquidation Act, 44 ALR5th 683.

§ 26-28-101.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Ancillary state” means any state other than a domiciliary state;

“Delinquency proceeding” means any proceeding commenced against an insurer pursuant to this chapter for the purpose of liquidating, rehabilitating, reorganizing or conserving the insurer;

“Domiciliary state” means the state in which an insurer is incorporated or organized, or in the case of an insurer incorporated or organized in a foreign country, the state in which the insurer, being authorized to do business therein, has at the commencement of delinquency proceedings, the largest amount of its assets held in trust and assets held on deposit for the benefit of its policyholders or policyholders and creditors in the United States, and that insurer is deemed to be domiciled in that state;

“Foreign country” means territory not in any state;

“General assets” means:

All property not specifically mortgaged, pledged, deposited or otherwise encumbered for the security or benefit of specified persons or limited classes of persons and as to any specifically encumbered property, all such property or its proceeds in excess of the amount necessary to discharge the sums secured thereby; and

Assets held in trust and assets held on deposit for the security or benefit of all policyholders or all policyholders and creditors in the United States.

“Impairment” or “insolvency” means that an insurer does not possess assets at least equal to all liabilities and required reserves together with its total issued and outstanding capital stock if a stock insurer, or the minimum surplus if a mutual or reciprocal insurer required by this code to be maintained for the kinds of insurance it is then authorized to transact and the capital or surplus is deemed impaired and the insurer is deemed insolvent;

“Insurer” means any person, firm, corporation, association or aggregation of persons doing an insurance business and subject to the insurance supervisory authority of, or to liquidation, rehabilitation, reorganization or conservation by the commissioner or the equivalent insurance supervisory official of another state, including health organizations regulated under W.S.

26-48-201

through

26-48-212

;

“Preferred claim” means any claim with respect to which the law of the state or of the United States accords priority of payments from the insurer’s general assets;

“Receiver” means receiver, liquidator, rehabilitator or conservator as the context requires;

“Reciprocal state” means any state other than this state in which in substance and effect the provisions of the Uniform Insurers Liquidation Act, as defined in W.S.

26-28-119

, are in force, including the provisions requiring that the commissioner of insurance or equivalent supervisory official be the receiver of a delinquent insurer;

“Secured claim” means:

Any claim secured by mortgage, trust deed, pledge, deposit as security, escrow or otherwise, but not including special deposit claim or claims against general assets; and

Claims which more than four (4) months prior to the commencement of delinquency proceeding in the state of the insurer’s domicile have become liens upon specific assets by reason of judicial process.

“Special deposit claim” means any claim secured by a deposit made pursuant to statute for the security or benefit of a limited class of persons, but not including any general assets;

“State” means any state of the United States, the District of Columbia and Puerto Rico.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 588; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-588; W.S. 1977, §

26-33-101

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 2007, ch. 42, § 2.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, inserted “including health organizations regulated under W.S.

26-48-201

through

26-48-212

” in (a)(vii).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 26-28-102.
Delinquency proceedings; jurisdiction; venue; change of venue; exclusiveness of remedy; appeal.

The district court has original jurisdiction of any delinquency proceeding under this chapter and any court with jurisdiction may make any necessary or proper orders to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

The venue of delinquency proceedings against a domestic insurer is in the county of the insurer’s principal place of business. The venue of delinquency proceedings against foreign and alien insurers is in the district court for Laramie county.

At any time after the commencement of a proceeding under this chapter, the commissioner may apply to the court for an order changing the venue of and removing the proceeding to Laramie county or to any other county of this state in which he deems that the proceeding may be most economically and efficiently conducted.

Delinquency proceedings pursuant to this chapter constitute the sole and exclusive method of liquidating, rehabilitating, reorganizing or conserving an insurer, and no court shall entertain a petition for a commencement of such proceedings unless the petition is filed in the name of the state on the relation of the commissioner.

An appeal shall lie to the supreme court from any order:

Granting or refusing rehabilitation, liquidation or conservation; and

In delinquency proceedings having the character of a final order as to the particular portion of the proceedings embraced therein.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 589; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-589; W.S. 1977, §

26-33-102

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to transfer of trial, see Rule 40.1, W.R.C.P.

§ 26-28-103.
Delinquency proceedings; commencement.

The commissioner shall commence any delinquency proceedings by application to the court for an order directing the insurer to show cause why the commissioner should not have the relief prayed for. On the return of the order to show cause, and after a full hearing, the court shall either deny the application or grant the application, together with any other relief as the nature of the case and the interests of the policyholders, creditors, stockholders, members, subscribers or the public require.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 590; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-590; W.S. 1977, §

26-33-103

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-28-104.
Injunctions.

Upon application by the commissioner for an order to show cause, or at any time thereafter, the court, without notice, may issue an injunction restraining the insurer, its officers, directors, stockholders, members, subscribers, agents and all other persons from the transaction of its business or the waste or disposition of its property until further court order.

The court, at any time during a proceeding under this chapter, may issue any other injunctions or orders deemed necessary to prevent interference with the:

Commissioner or the proceeding;

Waste of the insurer’s assets;

Commencement or prosecution of any actions;

Obtaining of preferences, judgments, attachments or other liens; or

Making of any levy against the insurer or against its assets or any part thereof.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no bond is required of the commissioner as a prerequisite for the issuance of any injunction or restraining order pursuant to this section.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 591; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-591; W.S. 1977, §

26-33-104

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to injunctions, see Rule 65, W.R.C.P.

§ 26-28-105.
Grounds for receivership; rehabilitation of domestic insurer.

The commissioner may apply to the court for an order appointing him as receiver of and directing him to rehabilitate a domestic insurer if the insurer:

Is impaired or insolvent or is in unsound or such other condition or using such methods and practices in the conduct of its business as to render its further transaction of insurance hazardous or injurious to its policyholders;

Refuses to submit any of its books, records, accounts or affairs to reasonable examination by the commissioner;

Conceals or removes records or assets or otherwise violates W.S.

26-24-129

;

Fails to comply with the commissioner’s order to make good an impairment of capital or surplus or both;

Transfers or attempts to transfer substantially its entire property or business, or enters into any transaction the effect of which is to merge substantially its entire property or business in that of any other insurer without first obtaining the commissioner’s written approval;

Willfully violates its charter or articles of incorporation or any law of this state;

Has an officer, director or manager who refuses to be examined under oath concerning its affairs, for which purposes the commissioner may conduct and enforce by all appropriate and available means any such examination under oath in any other state or territory of the United States in which the officer, director or manager may then presently be, to the full extent permitted by the laws of the other state or territory;

Is the subject of an application for the appointment of a receiver, trustee, custodian or sequestrator of the insurer or its property otherwise than pursuant to this code [title 26], but only if the appointment has been made or is imminent and its effect is or would be to oust the courts of this state of jurisdiction under this chapter;

Consents to a receivership order through a majority of its directors, stockholders, members or subscribers; or

Fails to pay a final judgment rendered against it in this state upon any insurance contract issued or assumed by it, within thirty (30) days after the judgment is final, or within thirty (30) days after the time for taking an appeal expires or within thirty (30) days after dismissal of an appeal before final termination, whichever date is later.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 592; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-592; W.S. 1977, §

26-33-105

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to receivers, see Rule 66, W.R.C.P.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 26-28-106.
Grounds for receivership; liquidation.

The commissioner may apply to the court for an order appointing him as receiver, if his appointment as receiver is not then in effect, and directing him to liquidate the business of a domestic insurer or of the United States branch of an alien insurer having trusteed assets in this state, regardless of whether or not there has been a prior order directing him to rehabilitate the insurer, upon any of the grounds specified in W.S.

26-28-105

, or if the insurer:

Does not transact business for a period of one (1) year; or

Is insolvent and has commenced voluntary liquidation or dissolution or attempts to:

Commence or prosecute any action or proceeding to liquidate its business or affairs;

Dissolve its corporate charter; or

Procure the appointment of a receiver, trustee, custodian or sequestrator under any law except this code [title 26].

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 593; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-593; W.S. 1977, §

26-33-106

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to receivers, see Rule 66, W.R.C.P.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 26-28-107.
Grounds for conservation; foreign insurers or alien insurers.

The commissioner may apply to the court for an order appointing him as receiver or ancillary receiver and directing him to conserve the assets within this state of a foreign or alien insurer upon:

Any of the grounds specified in W.S.

26-28-105

or

26-28-106

; or

The ground that the insurer’s property has been sequestrated in its domiciliary sovereignty or in any other sovereignty; or

If an alien insurer, the ground that the insurer failed to comply, within the time the commissioner designated, with an order by the commissioner to make good an impairment of its trusteed funds.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, §§ 594, 595; W.S. 1957, §§ 26.1-594, 26.1-595; W.S. 1977, §§

26-33-107

,

26-33-108

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to receivers, see Rule 66, W.C.R.P.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 26-28-108.
Grounds for ancillary liquidation of foreign insurers.

The commissioner may apply to the court for an order appointing him as ancillary receiver of and directing him to liquidate the business of a foreign insurer having assets, business or claims in this state upon the appointment in the domiciliary state of that insurer of a receiver, liquidator, conservator, rehabilitator or other officer for the purpose of liquidating the business of that insurer.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 596; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-596; W.S. 1977, §

26-33-109

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-28-109.
Order of rehabilitation.

An order to rehabilitate a domestic insurer shall direct the commissioner immediately to:

Take possession of the insurer’s property and conduct its business; and

Take any steps the court directs toward removal of the causes and conditions making rehabilitation necessary.

If at any time the commissioner deems that further efforts to rehabilitate the insurer would be useless, he may apply to the court for an order of liquidation.

The commissioner or any interested person, upon notice to the commissioner, may apply to the court for an order terminating the rehabilitation proceedings and permitting the insurer to resume possession of its property and the conduct of its business. No termination order shall be made or entered unless, after a hearing, the court determines that the purposes of the proceeding have been fully accomplished.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 597; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-597; W.S. 1977, §

26-33-110

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-28-110.
Order of liquidation.

An order to liquidate the business of a domestic insurer shall direct the commissioner immediately to:

Take possession of the insurer’s property;

Liquidate the insurer’s business;

Deal with the insurer’s property and business in his own name as commissioner of insurance or in the insurer’s name, as the court directs; and

Give notice to all creditors with claims against the insurer to present those claims.

The commissioner may apply for and secure an order dissolving the corporate existence of a domestic insurer upon his application for an order of that insurer’s liquidation or at any time after the order is granted.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 598; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-598; W.S. 1977, §

26-33-111

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Cited

in

Moriarity v. State ex rel. McBride, 899 P.2d 879,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 131

(Wyo. 1995).

§ 26-28-111.
Order of conservation or ancillary liquidation of foreign or alien insurer.

An order to conserve a foreign or alien insurer’s assets requires the commissioner immediately to take possession of the insurer’s property within this state and to conserve it, subject to the court’s further direction.

An order to liquidate a foreign insurer’s assets in this state requires the commissioner immediately to take possession of the insurer’s property within this state and to liquidate it subject to the court’s orders and with due regard to the rights and powers of the domiciliary receiver as provided in this chapter.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 599; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-599; W.S. 1977, § 26-33-112; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-28-112.
Conduct of delinquency proceedings; domestic and alien insurers.

If under this chapter a receiver is to be appointed in delinquency proceedings for a domestic or alien insurer, the court shall appoint the commissioner as the receiver. The court shall order the commissioner immediately to take possession of the insurer’s assets and to administer those assets under the court’s orders.

As a domiciliary receiver, the commissioner is vested by operation of law with the title to all of the insurer’s property, contracts and right of action and all of its books and records, wherever located, as of the date of entry of the order directing him to rehabilitate or liquidate a domestic insurer or to liquidate the United States branch of an alien insurer domiciled in this state. The commissioner may recover and take possession of the insurer’s property, contracts and right of action and its books and records, except that ancillary receivers in reciprocal states, as to assets located in their states, have the rights and powers prescribed in this chapter for ancillary receivers appointed in this state as to assets located in this state.

The filing or recording of the order directing possession to be taken, or a certified copy thereof, in any office where instruments affecting title to property are required to be filed or recorded, imparts the same notice as is imparted by a deed, bill of sale or other evidence of title duly filed or recorded.

The commissioner as domiciliary receiver is responsible for the proper administration of all assets coming into his possession or control. The court may require a bond from the commissioner or his deputies if deemed desirable for the protection of the assets.

Upon taking possession of the insurer’s assets, the domiciliary receiver, subject to the court’s direction, immediately shall proceed to conduct the insurer’s business or to take any steps authorized by this chapter for rehabilitating, liquidating or conserving the insurer’s affairs or assets.

In connection with delinquency proceedings, the commissioner may appoint one (1) or more special deputy commissioners to act for him and he may employ such counsel, clerks and assistants as he deems necessary. The compensation of the special deputies, counsel, clerks or assistants and all expenses of taking possession of the insurer and of conducting the proceeding shall be fixed by the receiver, subject to the court’s approval, and shall be paid out of the insurer’s funds or assets. Within the limits of duties imposed upon them, special deputies have the powers of the receiver and, in the exercise of those powers, are subject to all of the duties imposed upon the receiver with respect to the proceedings.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 600; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-600; W.S. 1977, § 26-33-113; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to receivers, see Rule 66, W.R.C.P.

§ 26-28-113.
Conduct of delinquency proceedings; foreign insurers.

If under this chapter an ancillary receiver is to be appointed in delinquency proceedings for an insurer not domiciled in this state, the court shall appoint the commissioner as ancillary receiver. The commissioner shall file a petition requesting the appointment on the grounds set forth in W.S.

26-28-108

if:

He finds the insurer has sufficient assets located in this state to justify the appointment of an ancillary receiver; or

Ten (10) or more persons resident in this state having claims against the insurer file a petition with the commissioner requesting the appointment of an ancillary receiver.

The domiciliary receiver for the purpose of liquidating an insurer domiciled in a reciprocal state is vested by operation of law with the title to all of the insurer’s property, contracts and rights of action and all of its books and records located in this state. The domiciliary receiver has the immediate right to recover balances due from local agents, to obtain possession of any of the insurer’s books and records found in this state and to recover the insurer’s other assets located in this state, except that upon the appointment of an ancillary receiver in this state, the ancillary receiver, during the ancillary receivership proceedings, has sole right to recover the other assets. The ancillary receiver, as soon as practicable, shall liquidate from the securities those special deposit claims and secured claims which are proved and allowed in the ancillary proceedings in this state and shall pay the necessary expenses of the proceedings. He shall promptly transfer all remaining assets to the domiciliary receiver. Subject to the provisions of this subsection, the ancillary receiver and his deputies have the same powers and are subject to the same duties with respect to the administration of the assets as a receiver of an insurer domiciled in this state.

The domiciliary receiver of an insurer domiciled in the reciprocal state may sue in this state to recover any of the insurer’s assets to which he is entitled under the laws of this state.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 601; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-601; W.S. 1977, § 26-33-114; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-28-114.
Claims of nonresidents against domestic insurers.

In a delinquency proceeding begun in this state against a domestic insurer, claimants residing in reciprocal states may file claims either with the ancillary receivers, if any, in their states or with the domiciliary receiver. The claims shall be filed on or before the last date fixed for the filing of claims in the domiciliary delinquency proceedings.

Controverted claims belonging to claimants residing in reciprocal states may either:

Be proved in this state; or

If ancillary proceedings have been commenced in the reciprocal states, be proved in those proceedings.

If a claimant elects to prove his claim in ancillary proceedings and if notice of the claim and opportunity to appear and be heard is afforded the domiciliary receiver of this state, as provided in W.S.

26-28-115

with respect to ancillary proceedings in this state, the final allowance of the claim by the courts in the ancillary state shall be accepted in this state as conclusive as to its amount and shall also be accepted as conclusive as to its priority, if any, against special deposits or other security located within the ancillary state.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 602; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-602; W.S. 1977, § 26-33-115; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-28-115.
Claims against foreign insurers.

In a delinquency proceeding in a reciprocal state against an insurer domiciled in that state, claimants against the insurer who reside within this state may file claims either with the ancillary receiver, if any, appointed in this state, or with the domiciliary receiver. The claims shall be filed on or before the last date fixed for the filing of claims in the domiciliary delinquency proceedings.

Controverted claims belonging to claimants residing in this state may either:

Be proved in the domiciliary state as provided by the laws of that state; or

If ancillary proceedings have been commenced in this state, be proved in those proceedings.

If any claimant elects to prove his claim in this state, he shall file his claim with the ancillary receiver and shall give notice in writing to the receiver in the domiciliary state, either by registered mail or by personal service at least forty (40) days prior to the date set for hearing. The notice shall contain a concise statement of the amount of the claim, the facts on which the claim is based and the priorities asserted, if any. If the domiciliary receiver within thirty (30) days after the giving of the notice gives notice in writing to the ancillary receiver and to the claimant, either by registered mail or by personal service, of his intention to contest the claim, he is entitled to appear or to be represented in any proceeding in this state involving the claim adjudication. The final allowance of the claim by the courts of this state shall be accepted as conclusive as to its amount and shall also be accepted as conclusive as to its priority, if any, against special deposits or other security located within this state.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 603; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-603; W.S. 1977, § 26-33-116; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-28-116.
Claims generally.

All claims against an insurer against which delinquency proceedings are in progress shall set forth in reasonable detail the amount of the claim, or the basis upon which the amount can be ascertained, the facts upon which the claim is based and the priorities asserted, if any. All such claims shall be verified by the affidavit of the claimant, or someone authorized to act on his behalf and having knowledge of the facts, and shall be supported by documents material thereto.

All claims filed in this state shall be filed with the receiver, whether domiciliary or ancillary, in this state, on or before the last date for filing as specified in this chapter.

Within ten (10) days from the date of receipt of any claim, or within any further period as the court, for good cause shown, determines, the receiver shall report the claim to the court, specifying in the report his recommendation with respect to the action to be taken thereon. Upon receipt of the report, the court shall fix a time for hearing the claim and shall direct that the claimant or the receiver, as the court specifies, shall give notice as the court determines to those persons as appear to the court to be interested therein. The notices shall specify the time and place of the hearing and shall concisely state the amount and nature of the claim, the priorities asserted, if any, and the recommendation of the receiver with reference thereto.

All interested persons may appear at the hearing, and the court shall enter an order allowing, allowing in part or disallowing the claim. The order is appealable.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 604; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-604; W.S. 1977, § 26-33-117; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Quoted

in

Moriarity v. State ex rel. McBride, 899 P.2d 879,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 131

(Wyo. 1995).

§ 26-28-117.
Priority of certain claims.

In a delinquency proceeding against an insurer domiciled in this state, claims owing to residents of ancillary states are preferred claims if like claims are preferred under the laws of this state. All claims owing to residents or nonresidents shall be given equal priority of payment from general assets regardless of where the assets are located.

In a delinquency proceeding against an insurer domiciled in a reciprocal state, claims owing to residents of this state shall be preferred if like claims are preferred by the laws of that state.

The owners of special deposit claims against an insurer for which a receiver is appointed in this or any other state shall be given priority against their special deposits in accordance with the provisions of the statutes governing the creation and maintenance of the deposits. If there is a deficiency in any deposit so that the claims secured thereby are not fully discharged, the claimants may share in the general assets, but that sharing shall be deferred until general creditors, and also claimants against other special deposits who have received smaller percentages from their special deposits, have been paid percentages of their claims equal to the percentage paid from the special deposit.

The owner of a secured claim against an insurer for which a receiver has been appointed in this or any other state may surrender his security and file his claim as a general creditor, or the claim may be discharged by resort to the security, in which case the deficiency, if any, shall be treated as a claim against the insurer’s general assets on the same basis as claims of unsecured creditors. If the amount of the deficiency is adjudicated in ancillary proceedings as provided in this chapter, or if it is adjudicated by a court of competent jurisdiction in proceedings in which the domiciliary receiver has had notice and opportunity to be heard, the amounts are conclusive. Otherwise the amount shall be determined in the delinquency proceeding in a domiciliary state.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 605; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-605; W.S. 1977, § 26-33-118; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Cited

in

Moriarity v. State ex rel. McBride, 899 P.2d 879,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 131

(Wyo. 1995).

§ 26-28-118.
Attachment, garnishment or execution during pendency of delinquency proceedings.

During the pendency of delinquency proceedings in this or any reciprocal state, no action or proceeding in the nature of an attachment, garnishment or execution shall be commenced or maintained in the courts of this state against the delinquent insurer or its assets. Any lien obtained by any such action or proceeding within four (4) months prior to the commencement of any delinquency proceeding or at any time thereafter is void as against any rights arising in the delinquency proceeding.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 606; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-606; W.S. 1977, § 26-33-119; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Maintaining action, or entering judgment, not prohibited. —

This section does not prohibit a party from maintaining an action to obtain a judgment, or prohibit a court from entering a judgment. It only prohibits actions to enforce or collect on a judgment. Hoiness-La Bar Ins. v. Julien Constr. Co., 743 P.2d 1262,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 520

(Wyo. 1987).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity, construction, and application of Uniform Insurers Liquidation Act, 44 ALR5th 683.

§ 26-28-119.
Sections constituting Uniform Insurers Liquidation Act; interpretation and construction.

W.S. 26-28-101(a)(i) through (v) and (vii) through (xiii),

26-28-103

,

26-28-104

and

26-28-112

through

26-28-119

constitute and may be referred to as the Uniform Insurers Liquidation Act.

The Uniform Insurers Liquidation Act shall be so interpreted and construed as to carry out its general purpose to make uniform the law of those states that enact it. To the extent that its provisions when applicable conflict with other provisions of this chapter, the provisions of that act control.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 607; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-607; W.S. 1977, § 26-33-120; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity, construction, and application of Uniform Insurers Liquidation Act, 44 ALR5th 683.

§ 26-28-120.
Deposit of monies collected.

The monies the commissioner collects in a proceeding under this chapter shall be deposited in one (1) or more state or national banks, savings banks or trust companies. In case of insolvency or voluntary or involuntary liquidation of any such depository which is an institution organized and supervised under the laws of this state, the deposits are entitled to priority of payment on an equality with any other priority given by the banking laws of this state. The commissioner may deposit the monies or any part thereof in a national bank or trust company as a trust fund.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 608; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-608; W.S. 1977, § 26-33-121; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-28-121.
Commissioner exempt from payment of fees.

The commissioner is not required to pay any fee to any public officer in this state for filing, recording, issuing a transcript or certificate or authenticating any paper or instrument pertaining to the commissioner’s exercise of any of the powers or duties conferred upon him under this chapter, whether or not:

The paper or instrument is executed by the commissioner or his deputies, employees or attorneys of record; and

It is connected with the commencement of any action or proceeding by or against the commissioner or with subsequent conduct of that action or proceeding.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 609; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-609; W.S. 1977, § 26-33-122; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 26-28-122.
Power of commissioner to borrow on pledge of assets.

For the purpose of facilitating the rehabilitation, liquidation, conservation or dissolution of an insurer pursuant to this chapter, the commissioner, subject to court approval, may:

Borrow money and execute, acknowledge and deliver notes or other evidences of indebtedness therefor and secure the repayment of the notes or other evidences of indebtedness by the mortgage, pledge, assignment, transfer in trust or hypothecation of any of the insurer’s property; and

Take any other action necessary and proper to consummate any such loan and to provide for the repayment of that loan.

The commissioner has no obligation personally or in his official capacity to repay any loan made pursuant to this section.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 610; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-610; W.S. 1977, § 26-33-123; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-28-123.
Date rights fixed on liquidation.

The rights and liabilities of the insurer and of its creditors, policyholders, stockholders, members, subscribers and any other persons interested in its estate, unless the court otherwise directs, shall be fixed as of the date on which the order directing the insurer’s liquidation is filed in the office of the clerk of the court which made the order, subject to the provisions of this chapter with respect to the rights of claimants holding contingent claims.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 611; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-611; W.S. 1977, § 26-33-124; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Stated

in

Moriarity v. State ex rel. McBride, 899 P.2d 879,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 131

(Wyo. 1995).

§ 26-28-124.
Voidable transfers.

Any transfer of, or lien upon, an insurer’s property is voidable if it is:

Made or created within four (4) months prior to the granting of an order to show cause under this chapter, with the intent of giving to any creditor a preference or of enabling him to obtain a greater percentage of his debt than any other creditor of the same class; and

Accepted by the creditor having reasonable cause to believe that the preference will occur.

Any director, officer, employee, stockholder, member, subscriber and any other person acting on the insurer’s behalf who is involved in any such act or deed and any person receiving thereby any of the insurer’s property or the benefit of that property is personally liable therefor and is accountable to the commissioner.

The commissioner as a receiver in any proceeding under this chapter may avoid any transfer of or lien upon an insurer’s property which any creditor, stockholder, subscriber or member of the insurer might have avoided and may recover the property so transferred unless the person is a bona fide holder for value prior to the date of the entering of an order to show cause under this chapter. The property or its value may be recovered from anyone who receives it except a bona fide holder for value as specified in this subsection.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 612; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-612; W.S. 1977, § 26-33-125; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-28-125.
Priority of distribution of an insolvent insurer's assets.

The priorities of distribution of general assets from the company’s estate is as follows:

The costs and expenses of the administration, insolvency, liquidation and rehabilitation, including the claims handling expenses of the Wyoming Insurance Guaranty Association and of any similar organization in any other state as prescribed in W.S.

26-31-101

through

26-31-117

;

Wages actually owing to employees, other than officers of insurers, for services rendered within three (3) months prior to the date of commencement of a proceeding against the insurer under this chapter, but not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) to each employee and secured claims, including claims for taxes and debts due the federal or any state or local government which are secured by liens perfected prior to the commencement of delinquency proceedings;

Claims by policyholders, beneficiaries, insureds and liability claims against insureds covered under insurance policies and insurance contracts issued by the company, as set forth in W.S.

26-28-114

through

26-28-117

and claims of the Wyoming Insurance Guaranty Association and any similar organization in another state as prescribed in W.S.

26-31-110

;

All other claims of general creditors not falling within any other priority under this section, including claims for taxes and debts due the federal government or any state or local government which are not secured claims;

Claims of guarantee association certificate holders, guarantee capital shareholders and surplus note holders;

Proprietary claims of shareholders, members or other owners.

Upon the issuance of an order of liquidation with a finding of insolvency against a domestic company, the commissioner shall apply to the court requesting authority to disburse funds to the Wyoming Insurance Guaranty Association out of the company’s marshaled assets as funds become available in amounts equal to disbursements made by the association for claims handling expense and covered claims obligations on the presentation of evidence that the association made disbursements. The commissioner shall:

In the application request authority to make disbursements to similar organizations in other states provided the Wyoming Insurance Guaranty Association is entitled to like payment under the laws of the similar organization’s state of domicile with respect to insolvent companies domiciled in that state;

In determining the amounts available for disbursements to the Wyoming Insurance Guaranty Association and similar organizations in other states, reserve sufficient assets for the payment of the expenses of administration;

Establish procedures for the ratable allocation of disbursements to the Wyoming Insurance Guaranty Association and similar organizations in other states; and

Secure from the Wyoming Insurance Guaranty Association and each eligible similar organization in other states as a condition to advances in reimbursement of covered claims obligations an agreement to return to the commissioner on demand funds previously advanced as may be required to pay claims of secured creditors and claims falling within the priorities established in paragraphs (a)(ii) and (iii) of this section in accordance with such priorities.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 613; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-613; W.S. 1977, § 26-33-126; Laws 1979, ch. 55, § 1; 1983, ch. 59, § 1; ch. 190, § 1.

Quoted

in

Moriarity v. State ex rel. McBride, 899 P.2d 879,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 131

(Wyo. 1995).

§ 26-28-126.
Offsets.

In all cases of mutual debts or mutual credits between the insurer and another person in connection with any action or proceeding under this chapter, the credits and debts shall be set off and the balance only shall be allowed or paid, except as provided in subsection (b) of this section.

No offset shall be allowed in favor of any person specified in subsection (a) of this section if:

The insurer’s obligation to that person, at the date of the entry of any liquidation order or otherwise, as provided in W.S.

26-28-123

, does not entitle him to share as a claimant in the insurer’s assets;

The insurer’s obligation to that person is purchased by or transferred to that person with a view of its being used as an offset; or

The obligation of that person is to pay an assessment levied against the members of a mutual insurer, or against the subscribers of a reciprocal insurer, or is to pay a balance upon the subscription to the insurer’s capital stock.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 614; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-614; W.S. 1977, § 26-33-127; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.